Louisiana, session 2026, HB545.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. R.S. 9:3530(A)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
7 §3530. Fees; origination; notary, documentation; over-the-credit-limit fee
8 A.(1) A lender may charge an origination fee that does not exceed fifty
9 seventy-five dollars on a consumer loan or revolving loan account.
10 * * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.